Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,302
Connection device; unlawful repositioning; violation; penalty.

Except for fifth-wheel repositioning done pursuant to section 60-6,301, it shall be unlawful to reposition the fifth-wheel connection device of a truck-tractor and semitrailer combination while such combination is carrying cargo and on the state highway system. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1987, LB 39, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,185.01;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 398.